Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-27,187.03
Legislative findings.

The Legislature hereby
finds and declares that it is the policy of this state to make revisions in
Nebraska's tax structure to encourage businesses to locate in rural areas
of Nebraska in order to decrease unemployment, create new jobs, and increase
investment in rural areas of the state. It is also the policy of this state
to encourage the modernization of livestock facilities.

Laws 2014, LB836, § 2.
July 18, 2014